Hawaii statutes.
§451A-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Hearing aid" means any wearable instrument
or device and any parts, attachments, or accessories, including earmold, but
excluding batteries and cords, designed or offered for the purpose of aiding or
compensating impaired human hearing.

"Practice of dealing and fitting of
hearing aids" means the measurement of human hearing by an audiometer or
by any other means solely for the purpose of making selections, adaptations, or
sales of hearing aids or the manufacture of impressions for earmolds, and, at
the request of a physician or a member of a profession related to the practice
of medicine and surgery, the administration of audiograms for use in
consultation with the hard-of-hearing.

"Sale" means any transfer of title,
interest, or possession except transactions with distributors or dealers. [L
1969, c 205, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1992, c 202, §90; am L 1997,
c 88, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next